Utah statutes.
76-10-1102.   Gambling.

(1) A person is guilty of gambling if he:

(a)  participates in gambling;

(b)  knowingly permits any gambling to be played, conducted, or dealt upon or in any real or personal property owned, rented, or under the control of the actor, whether in whole or in part; or

(c)  knowingly allows the use of any video gaming device that is:

(i)  in any business establishment or public place; and

(ii)  accessible for use by any person within the establishment or public place.

(2)  Gambling is a class B misdemeanor, provided, however, that any person who is twice convicted under this section shall be guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

